Washington statutes.
RCW 18.59.110

Applications—Licenses—Limited permits.

Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees shall be established as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 for applications, initial and renewal licenses, and limited permits.

[ 1996 c 191 s 41; 1991 c 3 s 156; 1985 c 7 s 58; 1984 c 9 s 12.]